Mississippi, session 2026, HB1624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Mississippi Office of Student Financial Aid shall be the administering agency for distribution of funding under the State Educational Assistance Program (SEAP) available to members of the Mississippi National Guard who are selected to receive a scholarship under the program.  The Mississippi National Guard shall continue to accept applications and award scholarships to eligible applicants according to criteria established by the National Guard. (2)  The Mississippi National Guard shall certify to the Office of Student Financial Aid the name of each recipient of SEAP scholarships and the institution to which a student's award is payable.  Upon receipt of the certificate, the Office of Student Financial Aid shall remit payment to the applicable institution. (3)  Beginning with the 2027 fiscal year, the Legislature shall appropriate funding for the State Educational Assistance Program to the State Institutions of Higher Learning for the Support and Maintenance of Financial Aid Scholarship, Loan and Grant Programs and the Mississippi Office of Student Financial Aid. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.